New Jersey, session 222, S3686.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Honoring and Listening to Our First Responders Act or the HALO Act. 2.    a.  As used in this section, "first responder means a law enforcement officer, paid or volunteer firefighter, or paid or volunteer member of a duly incorporated first aid, emergency, ambulance, or rescue squad association. b.    It shall be disorderly persons offense to approach or remain within a distance of less than 25 feet of the first responder after having received instruction not to approach the first responder if the person acts with the purpose to: (1)   obstruct, impair, or interfere with the performance of the first responders official duties; or (2)   interfere with the first responders performance of official duties by threatening, intimidating, or harassing the first responder. c.     This section shall not preclude the prosecution and conviction of a person under any other applicable provision of law. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.